Utah statutes.
59-19-103.   Tax imposed on marihuana and controlled substances.
(1)  A tax is imposed on marihuana and controlled substances as defined under
this chapter at the following rates:
(a)  on each gram of marihuana, or each portion of a gram, $3.50;
(b)  on each gram of controlled substance, or each portion of a gram, $200;
and
(c)  on each 50 dosage units of a controlled substance that is not sold by
weight, or portion thereof, $2,000.
(2)  For the purpose of calculating the tax under this chapter, a quantity of
marihuana or other controlled substance is measured by the weight of the
substance, whether pure or impure or dilute, or by dosage units when the
substance is not sold by weight, in the dealer's possession.  A quantity of a
controlled substance is dilute if it consists of a detectable quantity of pure
controlled substance and any excipients or fillers.
